California, session 20252026, AB2494.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) California faces significant challenges related to biodiversity, climate change, wildfire-resilient forests, postfire recovery of forests, and public access to nature, and has set statewide strategies for addressing those challenges, including the nature-based climate solution climate targets, the California Forest Carbon Plan, the Natural and Working Lands Climate Smart Strategy, the State Air Resources Board’s Natural and Working Lands Carbon Inventory and Scoping Plan, Pathways to 30x30 biodiversity conservation targets, and the Outdoors for All Initiative. Lands that are owned and managed by the state should make a greater contribution toward reaching these goals than privately owned lands.(b) California seeks to develop management strategies to promote science-based decisionmaking that addresses diverse goals and objectives for landowners and forest managers, while promoting healthy forests that are resilient to disturbance.(c) Demonstrating land management tools for small public, private, tribal, and nongovernmental landowners improves the ability of landowners to manage forested lands for ecosystem health.(d) The Demonstration State Forest system provides for a living laboratory to exhibit tools available to manage forests in a variety of stand conditions and to test research hypotheses that may advise management techniques or supply information on forest health.(e) It is in the interest of the state to restore ecosystem conditions and functions in demonstration state forest lands and to develop or maintain stand conditions that reduce vulnerability to disturbance.(f) Demonstration state forests are public lands and important recreation assets, and should be managed to support recreational opportunities.(g) It is the policy of the state to respect California Native American tribal sovereignty and to seek opportunities for comanagement and integration of local indigenous traditional ecological knowledge in forest management.(h) The state recognizes the value of partnerships among tribes, local communities, nonprofit stewardship organizations, educational institutions, recreation interests, and public agencies in advancing forest stewardship, ecological restoration, public access, tribal cultural resource protection, and long-term forest resilience.(i) It is the policy of the state to accept or acquire lands, the reforestation or restoration of which is not assured under private ownership, to restore those lands for resiliency to disturbance and improved ecosystem function.(j) It is the policy of the state to encourage the prudent and responsible management of California’s forest resources to meet the public’s need for forest products.(k) It is the policy of the state to protect old growth trees.(l) The creation of stand conditions that are resilient to disturbance provides for multiple cobenefits relating to carbon capture, water and soil health, species diversity, recreational opportunities, and research.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 4629.6 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4629.6. Moneys deposited in the fund shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, only be expended for the following purposes:(a) To reimburse the State Board of Equalization for its administrative costs associated with the administration, collection, audit, and issuance of refunds related to the lumber products and engineered wood assessment established pursuant to Section 4629.5.(b) To pay refunds issued pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(c) To support the activities and costs of the department, the Department of Conservation, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the State Water Resources Control Board, and regional water quality control boards associated with the review of projects or permits necessary to conduct timber operations. On or after July 1, 2013, except for fees applicable for fire prevention or protection within state responsibility area classified lands or timber yield assessments, no currently authorized or required fees shall be charged by the agencies listed in this subdivision for activities or costs associated with the review of a project, inspection and oversight of projects, and permits necessary to conduct timber operations of those departments and boards.(d) For transfer to the department’s Forest Improvement Program for forest resources improvement grants and projects administered by the department pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4790) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4799.06) of Part 2.5.(e) To fund existing restoration grant programs, with priority given to the Fisheries Restoration Grant Program administered by the Department of Fish and Wildlife and grant programs administered by state conservancies.(f) (1) As a loan to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for activities to address environmental damage occurring on forest lands resulting from marijuana cultivation. Not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) may be loaned from the fund in a fiscal year pursuant to this paragraph. This paragraph shall become inoperative on July 1, 2017.(2) Any funds deposited into the fund pursuant to subdivision (d) or (f) of Section 12025 or subdivision (b), (c), (e), or (f) of Section 12025.1 of the Fish and Game Code shall be credited toward loan repayment.(3) Moneys from the General Fund shall not be used to repay a loan authorized pursuant to this subdivision.(g) To support demonstration state forests, as a supplement supplemental source, if necessary, to the moneys provided by the Forest Resources Improvement Fund, as established pursuant to Section 4799.13, as needed.(h) To the department for fuel treatment grants and projects pursuant to authorities under the Wildland Fire Protection and Resources Management Act of 1978 (Article 1 (commencing with Section 4461) of Chapter 7).(i) To the department to provide grants to local agencies responsible for fire protection, qualified nonprofits, recognized tribes, local and state governments, and resources conservation districts, undertaken on a state responsibility area (SRA) or on wildlands not in an SRA that pose a threat to the SRA, to reduce the costs of wildland fire suppression, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, promote adaptation of forested landscapes to changing climate, improve forest health, and protect homes and communities.(j) To the Natural Resources Agency to provide a reasonable per diem for attendance at a meeting of the advisory body for the state’s forest practice program by a member of the body who is not an employee of a government agency.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 4629.8 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4629.8. (a) Funds deposited in the fund shall be appropriated in accordance with the following priorities:(1) First priority shall be for funding associated with the administration and delivery of responsibilities identified in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 4629.6.(2) Only after paragraph (1) is funded, the second priority shall be, if deposits are sufficient in future years to maintain the fund, by 2016, at a minimum reserve of four million dollars ($4,000,000), for use and appropriation by the Legislature in years during which revenues to the account are projected to fall short of the ongoing budget allocations for support of the activities identified in paragraph (1).(3) Only after paragraphs (1) and (2) are funded, the third priority shall be in support of activities designated in subdivisions (d) to (f), inclusive, of Section 4629.6.(4) Only after paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, are funded, the fourth priority shall be to support the activities designated in subdivisions (g) to (j), inclusive, of Section 4629.6.(b) Funds shall not be used to pay for or reimburse any requirements, including mitigation of a project proponent or applicant, as a condition of any permit.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 4629.9 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4629.9. (a) On January 10, and annually thereafter on January 10, in conjunction with the Governor’s Budget, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, in consultation with the Secretary for Environmental Protection, shall submit to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee a report on the activities of all state departments, agencies, and boards relating to forest and timberland regulation. This report shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) A listing, by organization, of the proposed total costs associated with the review, approval, and inspection of timber harvest plans and associated permits and agreements.(2) The number of timber harvest plans, and acreage covered by the plans, reviewed and approved in the most recent fiscal year.(3) To the extent feasible, a listing of activities, personnel, and funding, by department, for the forest practice program for the most recent fiscal year, and the preceding 10 fiscal years, including, but not limited to, any other expenditures or transfers from the fund.(4) The number of staff in each organization dedicated fully or partially to (A) review of timber harvest plans, and (B) other forestry-related activities, the review of permits and notices filed pursuant to this chapter or the rules adopted by the state board, and the costs associated with those actions, by geographical location in the state.(5) The costs of other forestry-related activities undertaken. number of staff in each organization dedicated fully or partially to other activities, whether forestry-related or otherwise, funded pursuant to this article, and the costs associated with those actions.(6) A summary of any process improvements identified by the administration as part of ongoing review of the timber harvest process, including data and technology improvement needs.(7) Workload analysis for the forest practice program in each department, including, but not limited to, an assessment of whether there is adequate staff to efficiently and effectively review plans.(8) Any identified staffing needs, by department, and costs per position, to support more efficient and transparent review of timber harvest plans.(9) In order to assess efficiencies in the program and the effectiveness of spending, a set of measures for, and a plan for collection of data on, the program, including, but not limited to:(A) The number of timber harvest plans submitted, returned for incompleteness, accepted, reviewed, and approved.(B) Average and median time for plan review and time of review for any subsequent agreements or permits to support the conduct of timber operations under an approved timber harvest plan.(C) Number and percentage of preharvest inspections attended by each review team agency.(D) Number of acres under active plans.(E) Number of violations.(F) Evaluating ecological performance.(b) A report required to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 4.Section 4631 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4631.The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a)California faces significant challenges related to biodiversity, climate change, wildfire-resilient forests, post-fire recovery of forests, and public access to nature, and has set important goals regarding these challenges.(b)California seeks to develop adaptive management strategies to promote science-based decisionmaking that addresses diverse goals and objectives for landowners and forest managers, while promoting healthy forests that are resilient to disturbance.(c)Lands that are owned and managed by the state should make a greater contribution toward reaching these goals than privately owned lands.(d)It is in the interest of the state to restore state forest lands, including those having young, mature, or old growth forests to fulfill habitat and ecological functions, conditions, and processes, and to manage state forests consistent with the definition of “management” in Section 4639.(e)All old growth trees should be protected.(f)State forests should provide ample ground for robust research programs that adhere to the state’s environmental review process.(g)The state recognizes the importance of long-term adaptive management research and, in addition to providing demonstration state forests as living laboratories, an appropriate level of staffing should be provided to support project development, implementation, monitoring, and maintenance.(h)That appropriately planned timber harvests and long-term sustainable forestry can accelerate the development of complex, mature forest structure and conditions.(i)That tribal comanagement of forest lands, integrated with local indigenous traditional ecological knowledge, can accelerate the development of complex, mature forest structure and conditions.(j)It is the policy of the state to respect California Native American tribal sovereignty and to seek opportunities for comanagement and integration of local indigenous traditional ecological knowledge in forest management.(k)It is the policy of the state to accept or acquire lands, the reforestation or restoration of which is not assured under private ownership, to restore those lands with locally appropriate species and manage those lands for public benefit. (l)It is the policy of the state to encourage the prudent and responsible management of California’s forest resources to meet the public’s need for forest products.SEC. 5.Section 4631.5 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4631.5.The Legislature further declares that the state should do all of the following:(a)Manage demonstration state forests consistent with the definition of “management” in Section 4639.(b)Retain the existing land base of demonstration state forests for research and demonstration purposes and allow the sale of timber and other forest products.(c)Maintain long-term research efforts to support the diverse objectives of private timberland owners to balance sustainable forestry with improving ecosystem functions, conditions, and processes.(d)Cooperate with local governments in mitigating the impacts on school enrollment of geothermal development that occurs in proximity to state-owned forest lands.SEC. 5. Section 4631 of the Public Resources Code is repealed.4631.It is hereby declared to be in the interest of the welfare of the people of this state and their industries and other activities involving the use of wood, lumber, poles, piling, and other forest products, that desirable cutover forest lands, including those having young and old timber growth, be made fully productive and that the holding and reforestation of such lands is a necessary measure predicated on waning supplies of original old growth timber. It is further declared to be the policy of the state to acquire by purchase, exchange, lease, or grant all of the following:(a)Such cutover lands, the reforestation of which is not assured under private ownership, to reforest such lands during periods of unemployment and at other times.(b)Liquidating forest lands primarily suitable for timber production which may be acquired under precutting agreements.(c)Demonstration forests of 2,000 acres or less adapted to furnish local needs of investigation, demonstration, and education in those timber counties where the ownership pattern is such that management of small areas is an important problem.(d)One area, not to exceed approximately 40,000 acres, in each of the following forest districts, Coast Range Pine and Fir District, North Sierra Pine District and the South Sierra Pine District, for the purpose of demonstration of economical forest management. These areas shall not include virgin timber except that which is incidental to areas previously harvested.SEC. 6. Section 4631 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:4631. (a) The purpose of the demonstration state forest system is to acquire lands, the reforestation or restoration of which is not assured under private ownership, to manage the land for public benefit, including biodiversity conservation, recreation, ecosystem health, watershed health, and as a living laboratory for healthy forest structures.(b) Research on the demonstration state forest system shall inform management strategies that promote science-based decisionmaking addressing diverse goals and objectives, while promoting healthy forests that are resilient to disturbance.(c) The demonstration state forests are to be managed for habitat and ecosystem conditions that provide a foundation for robust research programs, including, but not limited to, those that develop or maintain mature forest conditions. For purposes of this subdivision, “managed” shall have the same meaning as “management” in Section 4639.(d) The state recognizes the importance of long-term management research and, in addition to providing demonstration state forests as living laboratories, the state shall endeavor to provide an appropriate level of staffing to support project development, implementation, monitoring, and maintenance.SEC. 7. Section 4631.5 of the Public Resources Code is repealed.4631.5.It is further declared to be in the interest of the welfare of the people of this state that the state do all of the following:(a)Retain the existing land base of state forests in timber production for research and demonstration purposes.(b)Cooperate with local governments in mitigating the impacts on school enrollment of geothermal development which occurs in proximity to state-owned forest lands.SEC. 8. Section 4631.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:4631.5. (a) The secretary may enter into comanagement agreements with California Native American tribes to incorporate traditional ecological knowledge and indigenous knowledge into the management direction of a forest in the demonstration state forest system. All such California Native American tribes are recognized as sovereign entities under the inherent right of self-governance affirmed by Section 65352.4 of the Government Code, Executive Order No. B-10-11, and Executive Order No. N-15-19, regardless of federal recognition status. Comanagement agreements shall further the tribal engagement and leadership objectives described in subdivision (d) of Section 71451.(b) Research shall be allowed on land in the demonstration state forest system that informs forest management strategies, science-based decisionmaking, biodiversity, durable onsite carbon storage or sequestration, habitat, water and soil quality, watershed health, tribal stewardship, or other goals that further healthy and resilient ecosystems.(c) Timber harvesting within the demonstration state forest system may occur if in furtherance of any of the following objectives:(1) Research in pursuit of the goals identified in subdivision (b).(2) The demonstration of management strategies, in pursuit of the goals identified in Section 4631, available to nonindustrial landowners, including, but not limited to, public, private, tribal, or nongovernmental organization-owned lands.(3) The application of proven techniques, as well as testing novel or emerging management approaches, to address vulnerable stand conditions and restore them to resilient ecosystems.(d) Demonstration state forests shall reasonably provide for recreation opportunities, including camping, biking, equestrian access, hiking, foraging, and other activities as deemed appropriate by the board.(e) This section does not limit the use of forest management practices authorized under the Z‘berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973 (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511)) and the California Forest Practice Rules (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 895) of Division 1.5 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations) to achieving the objectives of this section or Section 4631.(f) (1) The department shall annually report to the board, at one of its regularly scheduled meetings, progress towards meeting restoration and conservation targets identified in forest management plans.(2) Metrics or targets used to track progress may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(A) Invasive species control.(B) Durable onsite carbon storage and sequestration.(C) Acres treated with prescribed fire.(D) Improved habitat connectivity, water quality, or other ecosystem conditions.(g) The state shall cooperate with local governments in mitigating the impacts on school enrollment of geothermal development that occurs in proximity to state-owned forest lands.SEC. 9. Section 4635.1 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:4635.1. “California Native American tribe” has the same meaning as in Section 21073.SEC. 10. Section 4635.2 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:4635.2. “Comanagement” means a collaborative effort established through an agreement in which two or more sovereigns mutually negotiate, define, and allocate amongst themselves the sharing of management functions and responsibilities for ancestral lands and waters in a given territory or area.SEC. 6.SEC. 11. Section 4639 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4639. (a) “Management” means the handling of forest vegetation, water, and soils within state forests, including, but not limited to, demonstration state forests, to maximize biodiversity conservation and wildfire resilience while supporting durable onsite carbon storage and sequestration, watershed conservation, water quality enhancement, climate mitigation and resiliency goals, equitable forest access, wildlife and fish habitat, recreation opportunities, education, and compatible research efforts. the demonstration state forest system for public benefits.(b)To the extent consistent with the definition in subdivision (a), all forest management practices recognized under the California Forest Practice Rules (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 895) of Division 1.5 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations) shall be considered valid tools for achieving the objectives listed in subdivision (a).(b) For purposes of this section, “public benefits” includes, but are not limited to, biodiversity conservation and habitat, durable onsite carbon storage and sequestration, climate resiliency and adaptation, ecosystem function, recreation, watershed health, wildfire resilience, and a living laboratory for ecological research.SEC. 7.Section 4649.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:4649.5.The sale of timber and other forest products shall occur in a manner consistent with the definition of “management” in Section 4639.SEC. 8.SEC. 12. Section 4651 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4651. (a) The management of state demonstration forests and the cutting and sale of timber and other forest products from demonstration state forests shall conform to regulations prepared by the director and approved by the board.(b) The board shall establish a preference for local sawmills. regulations may establish a preference for small or local sawmills.(c)The board shall establish measurable goals and include performance metrics in the forest management plan for each state forest to cumulatively track progress toward restoration and management targets.SEC. 9.SEC. 13. Section 4652 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4652. (a) The department may collect recreational user fees for overnight camping and reserved group activities in a demonstration state forest.(b) All recreational user fees received by the department during each fiscal year shall be deposited into the Forest Resources Improvement Fund and shall be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to reimburse the department’s cost of maintaining and improving the campground facilities, associated recreational facilities, natural environment, and access thereto.(c) Receipts from the sales of forest products and recreational user fees shall be deposited monthly with the State Treasurer in the Forest Resources Improvement Fund. The Controller shall keep a record of accounts of such receipts separately.(d) Any other funds generated by a demonstration state forest shall be deposited into the Forest Resources Improvement Fund.SEC. 10.SEC. 14. Section 4656 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4656. (a) This chapter does not interfere with the reasonable use of state forests for hunting, fishing, foraging, recreation, and camping, except as otherwise provided by law.(b) The use of state forest lands for prescribed herbivory, recreation concession, and surface mining of onsite existing rock pits for forest-related road work work, including, but not limited to, the construction of watercourse crossings, shall be permitted pursuant to regulations established by the board in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and reflect the definition of “management” in Section 4639. The use and development of water facilities for irrigation and power shall be permitted as provided by law.SEC. 11.SEC. 15. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.